Washington statutes.
RCW 15.26.040

Tree fruit research commission created—Membership.

There is hereby created the Washington tree fruit research commission, to be thus known and designated. The commission shall be composed of nine members. Three members to be appointed by the Washington state fruit commission, five members to be appointed by the Washington apple commission, and one member representing the winter pear industry to be appointed by the director. The director or his or her duly authorized representative shall be ex officio member with a vote, to represent all assessed commodities. The appointed members of the commission shall serve at the will of their respective appointers even though appointed for specific terms as set forth in RCW 15.26.070.

[ 2010 c 8 s 6026; 1969 c 129 s 4.]